Utah statutes.
53B-13a-106.   Cesar Chavez Scholarship Program.

(1)  The Cesar Chavez Scholarship Program is created within the Utah Centennial Opportunity Program for Education.

(2)  To qualify for a Cesar Chavez Scholarship, a student must:

(a)  be an eligible student as defined in Section 53B-13a-102; and

(b)  have a family income less than 200% of the federal poverty guideline for the family size.

(3) (a)  Cesar Chavez Scholarships shall be awarded in the following amounts:

(i)  if the scholarship recipient is enrolled at a public institution, an amount not to exceed the total of resident tuition and general fee charges; or

(ii)  if the scholarship recipient is enrolled at a private, nonprofit institution, an amount not to exceed the total of tuition and general fee charges.

(b)  A scholarship for a student enrolled at a private, nonprofit institution may not exceed the maximum program grant established by the board for the fiscal year.

(4)  The board may allocate up to 10% of the money appropriated to the board for the Utah Centennial Opportunity Program in Education for the Cesar Chavez Scholarship Program.

